Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 4 Foster Care
37-2-409. Permanency hearings.

In addition to the other requirements of this part, the judge or magistrate shall hold a hearing within twelve (12) months of the date of foster care placement for each child in foster care. As long as a child remains in foster care, subsequent permanency hearings conducted pursuant to subsection (b) shall be held no less frequently than every twelve (12) months from the date of the previous permanency hearing for each child, or as otherwise required by federal regulations and notwithstanding subdivision (b)(4).

The child shall be present for the permanency hearing. The court shall confer with the child, who is able to communicate, in an age appropriate manner regarding the child's views on the provisions of the permanency plan developed for the child. For all children, absent or present, evidence shall be presented as to the child's progress and needed services. The only exceptions to the child's mandatory attendance shall be a child who is under a doctor's care preventing the child from attending, is placed outside the state or is on documented runaway status. In such event, the court shall require the guardian ad litem, case manager for the department or other case manager of the child to attest that the child participated in the development of the permanency plan or has been counseled on the provisions of the permanency plan, if age appropriate. In the child's absence, evidence shall be presented as to the child's progress and needed services. To the extent practicable, the court shall schedule such hearings at times intended to be minimally disruptive to daily activities of the child.

In an effort to achieve early permanency, the purpose of these permanency hearings shall be to review the permanency plan and goals for the child. The hearings and plan shall address which goals continue to be appropriate for the child in order to achieve permanent placement and shall include a timeline for achieving each goal. Possible goals include:

Return of the child to parent;

Permanent placement with a fit and willing relative or relatives;

Adoption, giving appropriate consideration to § 36-1-115(g) when applicable;

Permanent guardianship; or

Planned permanent living arrangement.

Placement in another planned permanent living arrangement shall only be appropriate in cases where the state agency has documented a compelling reason for determining that the other goals would not be in the best interests of the child because of the child's special needs or circumstances.

The purpose of these permanency hearings shall also be to determine the extent of compliance of all parties with the terms of the permanency plan, and the extent of progress in achieving the goals of the plan.

In the case of a child who has reached sixteen (16) years of age, the court shall review and ratify an independent living plan for the child. At the hearing for a child who has reached seventeen (17) years of age, the court shall ensure, and the record shall reflect, that the child has notice of and understands the child's opportunity to receive, if eligible, all available voluntary post-custody services from the department by having the department present evidence regarding services that are available to the child beginning at eighteen (18) years of age. Three (3) months prior to the planned release of a child at seventeen (17) years of age or older, a permanency hearing shall be held for the purposes of reviewing the child's transition plan to independent living.

At this hearing, all evidence that would be admissible at a permanency hearing pursuant to § 37-1-129 shall be admissible. In the event the court finds that any party has not complied with the terms of the permanency plan for the child, it may, consistent with §§ 37-1-129(c) and 37-2-403(c), issue such orders as may be appropriate to enforce compliance. Parental rights may not be terminated, except in accordance with a petition filed for that purpose and filed pursuant to title 36, chapter 1, part 1 or this part.

If a hearing is held concerning a child in the juvenile court, or any other court, on a custody petition, petition to terminate parental rights, or for any other reason that addresses the issues in subsection (b), this hearing shall satisfy the requirement for a hearing for that child. If a hearing is not otherwise scheduled, the court shall automatically schedule a hearing for each child in foster care in a timely fashion to ensure that the hearing is held within the time provided in subsection (a).

This section shall not be construed to prevent a judge from holding hearings more frequently if the judge deems it necessary.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 8; 1982, ch. 811, § 5; 1983, ch. 438, § 17; T.C.A., § 37-1508; Acts 1988, ch. 560, § 11; 1996, ch. 1054, § 103; 1996, ch. 1079, § 115; 1998, ch. 1097, §§ 19-21; 2000, ch. 805, § 1; 2002, ch. 629, § 5; 2007, ch. 372, § 10; 2008, ch. 1046, § 1; 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2010, ch. 842, § 11; 2012, ch. 1016, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to revise appropriate references from “child support referees” and “juvenile referees” to “child support magistrates” and “juvenile magistrates” in the code as supplements are published and volumes are replaced.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).

37-2-410. Rehearing — Modification of order.

Any interested person, at any time while the child is under the jurisdiction of the court, may file a petition, in writing and under oath, for a rehearing upon all matters coming within this part, and upon rehearing, the court may, consistent with §§ 37-1-129(c) and37-2-403(d), modify or set aside any order so reviewed.

Acts 1976, ch. 731, § 9; T.C.A., § 37-1509; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 116.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, V. Children (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 451 (1978).

37-2-411. Annual report on foster care — Confidentiality of report — Injunction and action for damages.

Each year the department of children's services shall prepare and issue a report on foster care in Tennessee. The report shall include an analysis, evaluation or estimate, as appropriate, of the following, on a statewide basis:

The number of children in foster care;

The amount of funds expended by federal, state and local governments for maintenance payments to foster parents, group homes and institutes;

The amount of funds expended by federal, state and local governments on services to foster children and their natural parents or guardians;

The types of services being offered to parents and their children in order to keep the family together;

The number of foster children eligible for adoption, the number of such children adopted, and the number of foster children determined not to be adoptable and the reasons therefor;

The number of foster children placed in a planned permanent living arrangement or guardianship;

The size of caseloads of probation officers and social workers, the effect such caseloads have on the services offered to parents or their children, and the effectiveness of such services;

The movement of foster children within the program from placement to placement;

The foster care-related qualifications, education, and in-service training of social workers and probation officers who handle such cases; and

Any other matters relating to foster children that the department deems appropriate to be included in the report. The report shall be published as part of the department's annual report required by § 37-5-105(4).

All personal information and records obtained by the department pursuant to this section shall be confidential and may not be disclosed in this report in a way that could identify any individual, adult or child, in foster care or receiving assistance from the department or other child care agency.

Any person may bring an action against an individual who has willingly and knowingly released confidential information or records concerning such person in violation of this section, for the greater of the following amounts:

Five hundred dollars ($500); or

Three (3) times the amount of actual damages, if any, sustained by the plaintiff.

Any person may bring an action to enjoin the release of confidential information or records in violation of this part, and may in the same action seek damages as provided in this section. It is not a prerequisite to an action under this section that the plaintiff suffer or be threatened with actual damages.

Acts 1979, ch. 272, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-1511; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 2000, ch. 981, § 51; 2002, ch. 629, § 6; 2015, ch. 178, §§ 2, 3.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “and the shifting responsibility for such children within the county probation department or children's services department” from the end of (a)(8); substituted “the” for “such” at the end of the first sentence of (a)(10) and rewrote the second sentence of (a)(10) which read, “The report shall be submitted to the governor and general assembly no later than January of each year.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 178, § 5. April 16, 2015.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of plans and records, §37-2-408.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

37-2-412. Smoke detectors required in foster care dwellings.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “approved smoke detector” means a device that senses visible or invisible particles of combustion and has been investigated and listed in accordance with standards prescribed by:

A nationally recognized and approved independent testing agency laboratory, such as Underwriters' Laboratories' Standard for Single and Multiple Station Smoke Detectors (UL 217); or

An agency authorized to make independent inspections by the state fire marshal.

No person, agency, institution or home, whether public or private, shall:

Provide foster care services within any dwelling unless an approved smoke detector is installed and maintained within such dwelling by the person, agency, institution or home. When activated, the detector shall initiate an alarm that is audible in the sleeping rooms of the dwelling; or

Tamper with or remove any smoke detector required by this section, or a component thereof.

All smoke detectors required by this section:

Shall be installed in accordance with the manufacturer's directions, unless they conflict with applicable law; and

May be wired directly (hardwired) to the building's power supply, powered by a self-monitored battery, or operated with a plug-in outlet fitted with a plug restrainer device, provided the outlet is not controlled by any switch other than the main power supply.

Compliance with this section shall not relieve any person, agency, institution or home from the requirements of any other applicable law, ordinance, rule or regulation. Nothing in this section shall be construed to be in derogation of § 68-120-111.

The department of children's services shall enforce this section only for its own foster homes or for agencies that it licenses pursuant to chapter 5, part 5 of this title, and it shall periodically undertake appropriate activities to encourage and ensure compliance.

Any violations noted by the department as a result of its inspections of child care agencies pursuant to § 37-5-513 shall be processed in the manner prescribed in that section.

The provisions of this section as it applies to persons, agencies, institutions or homes licensed by any other departments of this state to provide foster care for children shall be enforced by those departments. Those departments shall periodically undertake appropriate activities to encourage and ensure compliance.

Acts 1990, ch. 619, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 51, 58.

Cross-References. Smoke alarms, family rental units, §68-102-151.

Smoke alarms, residential buildings, §68-120-112.

37-2-413. Department rulemaking to comply with federal regulations.

The department of children's services is authorized to adopt mandatory rules binding on the courts and agencies subject to this part to implement the provisions of any changes in federal law relative to compliance with any foster care review processes set forth in federal law.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall have authority to implement any rules that may be required pursuant to subsection (a) by emergency rules to be effective immediately upon approval by the attorney general and reporter and filing with the office of the secretary of state; provided, that any permanent rules must follow the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 2.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 117; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all reference to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes replaced.

37-2-414. Kinship Foster Care Program.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of children's services; and

“Foster parent” means any person with whom a child in the care, custody or guardianship of the department is placed for temporary or long-term care, but shall not include any persons with whom a child is placed for the purpose of adoption.

There is established a “Kinship Foster Care Program” in the department.

When a child has been removed from such child's home and is in the care, custody or guardianship of the department, the department shall attempt to place the child with a relative for kinship foster care. If the relative is approved by the department to provide foster care services, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the department regarding foster care services, and a placement with the relative is made, the relative may receive payment for the full foster care rate for the care of the child and any other benefits that might be available to foster parents, whether in money or in services.

The department shall establish, in accordance with the provisions of this section, eligibility standards for becoming a kinship foster parent.

Relatives within the first, second or third degree to the parent or stepparent of a child who may be related through blood, marriage or adoption may be eligible for approval as a kinship foster parent.

The kinship foster parent shall be twenty-one (21) years of age or older, except that if the spouse or partner of the relative is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and living in the home, and the relative is between eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21) years of age, the department may waive the age requirement.

A person may become a kinship foster parent only upon the completion of an investigation to ascertain if there is a state or federal record of criminal history for the prospective kinship foster parent or any other adult residing in the prospective parent's home;

A prospective kinship foster parent shall supply fingerprint samples and submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation;

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall conduct the investigation and shall make the results of the investigation available to the department in accordance with this section. The department shall maintain the confidentiality of the investigation results and shall use the results only for purposes of determining a person's eligibility to become a kinship foster parent; and

It is unlawful, except for the purpose of determining a person's eligibility for kinship foster care, for any person to disclose information obtained under this subdivision (b)(3)(C). Any person violating this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.

The department shall determine whether the person is able to care effectively for the foster child by:

Reviewing personal and professional references;

Observing during a home visit of the kinship foster parent with household members; and

Interviewing the kinship foster parent.

The department and the kinship foster parent shall develop a case plan for the foster care of the child. The plan shall be periodically reviewed and updated. If the plan includes the use of an approved child care center, group child care home or family child care home, the department shall pay for child care arrangements, according to established rates.

The kinship foster parent shall cooperate with any activities specified in the case plan for the foster child, such as counseling, therapy or court sessions, or visits with the foster child's parents or other family members.

The commissioner of children's services shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The department of children's services and the commission on aging and disability shall collaboratively design and implement a full range of educational, counseling, referral, and other services designed to encourage and support elderly foster parents and disabled relative caregivers who participate in the relative caregiver program. The collective goal of such services shall be maximization of family stability and success within the relative caregiver program.

Acts 1997, ch. 170, §§ 2, 3; 2000, ch. 981, § 59; 2003, ch. 44, § 1; 2005, ch. 196, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(h).

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

A Theory of Relativity: Kinship Foster Care May be the Key to Stopping the Pendulum of Terminations vs. Reunification, 51 Vand. L. Rev. 1427 (1998).

37-2-415. Foster parents' rights.

To the extent not otherwise prohibited by state or federal statute, the department shall, through promulgation of rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, implement each of the following tenets. With respect to the placement of any foster child with a foster parent that is contracted directly with the department of children's services, or through an agency that contracts with the department to place children in foster care, pursuant to this part:

The department shall treat the foster parent or parents with dignity, respect, trust and consideration as a primary provider of foster care and a member of the professional team caring for foster children;

The department shall provide the foster parent or parents with a clear explanation and understanding of the role of the department and the role of the members of the child's birth family in a child's foster care;

The foster parent or parents shall be permitted to continue their own family values and routines;

The foster parent or parents shall be provided training and support for the purpose of improving skills in providing daily care and meeting the special needs of the child in foster care;

Prior to the placement of a child in foster care, the department shall inform the foster parent or parents of issues relative to the child that may jeopardize the health and safety of the foster family or alter the manner in which foster care should be administered. The department shall fully disclose any information regarding past or pending charges of delinquency as a juvenile, criminal charges, if charged as an adult, and previous hospitalizations, whether due to mental or physical issues;

The department shall provide a means by which the foster parent or parents can contact the department twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week for the purpose of receiving departmental assistance;

The department shall provide the foster parent or parents timely, adequate financial reimbursement for the quality and knowledgeable care of a child in foster care, as specified in the plan; provided, that the amount of such financial reimbursement shall, each year, be subject to and restricted by the level of funding specifically allocated for such purpose by the general appropriations act;

The department shall provide clear, written explanation of the plan concerning the placement of a child in the foster parent's home. For emergency placements where time does not allow prior preparation of such explanation, the department shall provide such explanation as it becomes available. This explanation shall include, but is not limited to, all information regarding the child's contact with such child's birth family and cultural heritage, if so outlined;

During an emergency situation when a child must be placed in home-care due to the absence of parents or custodians, the department of children's services may request that a criminal justice agency perform a federal name-based criminal history record check of each adult residing in the home. The results of such check shall be provided to the department, which shall provide a complete set of each adult resident's fingerprints to the Tennessee bureau of investigation within ten (10) calendar days from the date the name search was conducted. The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall either positively identify the fingerprint subject or forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation within fifteen (15) calendar days from the date the name search was conducted. The child shall be removed from the home immediately if any adult resident fails to provide fingerprints or written permission to perform a federal criminal history check when requested;

When placement of a child in a home is denied as a result of a name-based criminal history record check of a resident and the resident contests that denial, each such resident shall, within five (5) business days, submit to the Tennessee bureau of investigation a complete set of such resident's fingerprints to the Tennessee criminal history record repository for submission to the federal bureau of investigation;

The Tennessee bureau of investigation may charge a reasonable fee, not to exceed seventy dollars ($70.00), for processing a fingerprint-based criminal history record check pursuant to this subdivision (a)(8);

As used in this section, “emergency situation” refers to those limited instances when the department of children's services is placing a child in the home of private individuals, including neighbors, friends, or relatives, as a result of a sudden unavailability of the child's primary caregiver;

Prior to placement, the department shall allow the foster parent or parents to review written information concerning the child and allow the foster parent or parents to assist in determining if such child would be a proper placement for the prospective foster family. For emergency placements where time does not allow prior review of such information, the department shall provide information as it becomes available;

The department shall permit the foster parent or parents to refuse placement within their home, or to request, upon reasonable notice to the department, the removal of a child from their home for good reason, without threat of reprisal, unless otherwise stipulated by contract or policy;

The department shall inform the foster parent or parents of scheduled meetings and staffing, concerning the foster child, and the foster parent or parents shall be permitted to actively participate in the case planning and decision-making process regarding the child in foster care. This may include individual service planning meetings, foster care reviews, and individual educational planning meetings;

The department shall inform a foster parent or parents of decisions made by the courts or the child care agency concerning the child;

The department shall solicit the input of a foster parent or parents concerning the plan of services for the child; this input shall be considered in the department's ongoing development of the plan;

The department shall permit, through written consent, the ability of the foster parent or parents to communicate with professionals who work with the foster child, including any therapists, physicians and teachers who work directly with the child;

The department shall provide all information regarding the child and the child's family background and health history, in a timely manner to the foster parent or parents. The foster parent or parents shall receive additional or necessary information, that is relevant to the care of the child, on an ongoing basis; provided, that confidential information received by the foster parents shall be maintained as such by the foster parents, except as necessary to promote or protect the health and welfare of the child;

The department shall provide timely, written notification of changes in the case plan or termination of the placement and the reasons for the changes or termination of placement to the foster parent or parents, except in the instances of immediate response for child protective services;

The department shall notify the foster parent or parents, in a complete manner, of all court hearings. This notification may include, but is not limited to, notice of the date and time of the court hearing, the name of the judge or hearing officer hearing the case, the location of the hearing, and the court docket number of the case. Such notification shall be made upon the department's receipt of this information, or at the same time that notification is issued to birth parents. The foster parent or parents shall be permitted to attend such hearings at the discretion of the court;

The department shall provide, upon request by the foster parent or parents, information regarding the child's progress after a child leaves foster care. Information provided pursuant to this subsection (a) shall only be provided from information already in possession of the department at the time of the request;

The department shall provide the foster parent or parents the training for obtaining support and information concerning a better understanding of the rights and responsibilities of the foster parent or parents;

The department shall consider the foster parent or parents as the possible first choice permanent parents for the child, who after being in the foster parent's home for twelve (12) months, becomes free for adoption or a planned permanent living arrangement;

The department shall consider the former foster family as a placement option when a foster child who was formerly placed with the foster parent or parents is to be re-entered into foster care;

The department shall permit the foster parent or parents a period of respite, free from placement of foster children in the family's home with follow-up contacts by the agency occurring a minimum of every two (2) months. The foster parent or parents shall provide reasonable notice, to be determined in the promulgation of rules, to the department for respite;

Child abuse/neglect investigations involving the foster parent or parents shall be investigated pursuant to the department's child protective services policy and procedures. A child protective services case manager from another area shall be assigned investigative responsibility. Removal of a foster child shall be conducted pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated and departmental policy and procedures. The department, after consultation with statewide foster parent associations, shall promulgate rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to govern the operation of a foster parent advocacy program. At a minimum, the rules shall provide that an advocate shall be educated in the procedures relevant to departmental investigations of alleged abuse and neglect, and once trained, the advocate shall be permitted to be present at all portions of investigations where the accused foster parent or parents are present, and that all communication received by such advocates therein shall be strictly confidential. Nothing contained in this subdivision (a)(23) shall be construed to abrogate the provisions of chapter 1 of this title, regarding procedures for investigations of child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse by the department of children's services and law enforcement agencies;

Upon request, the department shall provide the foster parent or parents copies of all information relative to their family and services contained in the personal foster home record; and

The department shall advise the foster parent or parents of mediation efforts through publication in departmental policy manuals and the Foster Parent Handbook. The foster parent or parents may file for mediation efforts in response to any violations of the preceding tenets.

In promulgation of rules pursuant to subsection (a), the department shall provide forty-five (45) days written notification of public hearings, held pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to the president of the Tennessee Foster Care Association and the president's designee.

At the time of placement of a child in a foster home, and no later than at the time the foster care placement contract is signed, the foster parent shall be informed, in writing, through a succinct checklist form, of all information that is available to the department regarding the child's:

Pending petitions, or adjudications of delinquency when the conduct constituting the delinquent act, if committed by an adult, would constitute first degree murder, second degree murder, rape, aggravated rape, rape of a child, aggravated robbery, especially aggravated robbery, kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping or especially aggravated kidnapping;

Behavioral issues that may affect the care and supervision of the child;

History of physical or sexual abuse;

Special medical or psychological needs of the child; and

Current infectious diseases.

All information shall remain confidential and not subject to disclosure to any person by the foster parent.

If a foster parent believes that the department, an employee of the department, an agency under contract with the department or an employee of an agency under contract with the department, has failed to follow the tenets listed in subsection (a), and that the failure has harmed or could harm a child who is or was in the custody of the department or that the failure has inhibited the foster parent's ability to meet the needs of a child as written in the permanency plan, then the foster parent may inform the child's case manager, who shall make every attempt to resolve the dispute.

If the foster parent believes that the dispute has not been adequately resolved by the case manager, the foster parent may contact the case manager's supervisor. The foster parent is encouraged to make such contact in writing and to forward any written communication between the foster parent and the department's employees to the employees' regional administrator and to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee within the department's central office. The department's central office shall maintain a record of any such communication that is received.

If the foster parent believes that the dispute has not been adequately resolved by the case manager's supervisor or supervisors, the foster parent may contact the regional administrator or the regional administrator's designee. This review shall include an in-person interview.

If the foster parent believes that the dispute has not been adequately resolved by the regional administrator or the regional administrator's designee, the foster parent may request, in writing via certified mail, that the department's central office review the actions of the department or the department's employee.

If a review is requested pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(B), the department shall conduct the review and respond in writing to the foster parent no later than thirty (30) days from the postmarked date of the foster parent's written mailed request. The review shall include, but not be limited to, a review of any previous communication mailed in by the foster parent and an in-person interview with the foster parent.

The department shall transmit to the Tennessee commission on children and youth copies of the written request made pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(B) no later than ten (10) days from the date the request was received. The department shall also transmit copies of the written response made pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(C). The copies shall be transmitted no later than ten (10) days from the date the response was sent pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(C).

If the foster parent believes that the dispute has not been adequately resolved by the department's central office, the foster parent may request in writing via certified mail that the Tennessee commission on children and youth review the actions of the department. The department shall fully comply with the commission in the review, including providing any records requested.

This subsection (d) shall not be construed to limit any rights otherwise granted to foster parents by law.

The department shall train all employees of the department who come in contact with foster parents regarding this section and § 37-2-416. All current employees shall receive such training no later than February 1, 2010, and new employees shall be trained within thirty (30) days from the date of their employment.

Acts 1997, ch. 549, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 493, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 508, §§ 4, 10, 11; 2000, ch. 981, § 51; 2002, ch. 629, § 7; 2004, ch. 877, § 1; 2005, ch. 265, § 6; 2008, ch. 796, § 1; 2009, ch. 270, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(i); 2015, ch. 199, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1999, ch. 493, § 1 and ch. 508, § 10 purported to add an identical subsection (c) to this section, but for the presence of subdivision (c)(1)(E) in the version included in ch. 493, § 1. The code commission determined that legislative intent dictated that the version included in Acts 1999, ch. 493, § 1 be enacted.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 549, § 1 provided that this section may be cited as the “Foster Parent Rights Act.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote (a)(23) which read, “Child abuse/neglect investigations involving the foster parent or parents shall be investigated pursuant to the department's child protective services policy and procedures. A child protective services case manager from another area shall be assigned investigative responsibility. Removal of a foster child will be conducted pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated and departmental policy and procedures. The department shall permit an individual selected by the membership of the Tennessee Foster Care Association to be educated concerning the procedures relevant to investigations of alleged abuse and neglect by the department and the rights of the accused foster parent or parents. Upon receiving such training, such individual shall be permitted to serve as advocate for the accused foster parent or parents. Such advocate shall be permitted to be present at all portions of investigations where the accused foster parent or parents are present, and all communication received by such advocate therein shall be strictly confidential. Nothing contained within this subdivision (a)(23) shall be construed to abrogate the provisions of chapter 1 of this title, regarding procedures for investigations of child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse by the department of children's services and law enforcement agencies;”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 199, § 4. July 1, 2015.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

37-2-416. Notice of hearing to foster parent, adoptive parent or relative providing care.

The department shall notify the foster parents, if any, or any prospective adoptive parent or relative providing care for the child in state custody with notice of any review or hearing to be held with respect to the child. The foster parents, if any, of such a child and any prospective adoptive parent or relative providing care for the child shall be provided with notice of the right to be heard in any review or hearing to be held with respect to the child, except that this section shall not be construed to require that any foster parent, prospective adoptive parent, or relative providing care for the child be made a party to such a review or hearing solely on the basis of such notice and right to be heard.

At each hearing, the court shall determine whether the department has complied with this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 1097, § 22; 2007, ch. 372, § 11; 2008, ch. 906, § 3.

37-2-417. Tennessee's Transitioning Youth Empowerment Act of 2010.

This section may be known and cited as “Tennessee's Transitioning Youth Empowerment Act of 2010.”

The department of children's services is authorized to develop a program to provide services to youth who are transitioning to adulthood from state custody. Services may be provided on a voluntary basis to any person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-one (21) years of age, who was in the custody of the department at the time of the person's eighteenth birthday and who is:

Completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential;

Enrolled in an institution which provides postsecondary or career and technical education;

Participating in a program or activity designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;

Employed for at least eighty (80) hours per month; or

Incapable of doing any of the activities described in subdivisions (b)(1)-(4) due to a medical condition, including a developmental or intellectual condition, which incapability is supported by regularly updated information in the permanency plan of the person. In such a case the person shall be in compliance with a course of treatment as recommended by the department.

Services may also be made available to any person who meets the requirements of subsection (b) but refused such services at the time of the person's eighteenth birthday if at any time the person seeks to regain services prior to the person's twenty-first birthday.

The advisory committee established in § 37-2-601 shall serve as an advisory committee for programs and services established by this section.

The commissioner of children's services shall establish policies and procedures in order to create and implement this program.

The department is authorized to seek federal funding or to participate in federal programs developed for this purpose.

Acts 2010, ch. 1065, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 653, § 1; 2015, ch. 55, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1065, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be repealed June 30, 2012. Acts 2012, ch. 653, § 1 repealed Acts 2010, ch. 1065, § 5, effective April 4, 2012.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” preceding “education” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 55, § 20. April 6, 2015.